District of Columbia statutes.
38-205

Report of enrollments and withdrawals.

The principal, head teacher, or teacher who gives private instruction of each educational institution shall, in accordance with the rules adopted by the Board pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], report to the Board the name, address, sex, and date of birth of each minor who resides permanently or temporarily in the District who transfers between schools or who enrolls in or withdraws from his or her school.

Feb. 4, 1925, 43 Stat. 807, ch. 140, Art. II, § 2
renumbered as Art. II, § 4 and amended, Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-247, § 2(a), 38 DCR 376
Sept. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 20-17, § 303(c), 60 DCR 9839
1981 Ed., § 31-405.
1973 Ed., § 31-209.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-17 substituted “principal, head teacher, or teacher who gives private instruction of each educational institution” for “principal, or head teacher of each public, independent, private, or parochial school, and each teacher who gives private instruction.”
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(c) of the Attendance Accountability Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-133, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11531, 20 DCSTAT 1973).